Nebraska, session 109, LB946.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB946 LB946
2026 2026
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate
$7,046,697 for FY2026-27 ($3,104,775 General Funds and $3,941,922 Federal
Funds) to the Department of Health and Human Services for medicaid
assisted-living facility rates for Program No. 348, to be used
specifically by the department to increase the current medicaid assisted-
living facility rates, which are included in Program No. 348 and paid as
a service as part of Nebraska's aged and disabled home and community-
based medicaid 1915(c) waiver program, to the daily rate of $78.45 for
FY2026-27, for both rural and urban assisted-living waiver days.
-2-